vi: Loại bộ điều khiển xe máy điều khiển từ xa: Điều khiển bằng ứng dụng (điện thoại/máy tính bảng); Tay cầm chơi game; Điều khiển bằng cử chỉ/chuyển động; Dạng báng súng; Bộ điều khiển vô lăng; Bộ phát dạng cần gạt; Khác
it: Tipo di controller del motociclo RC: Controllato tramite app (telefono/tablet); Gamepad; Controllo gestuale/del movimento; Impugnatura a pistola; Controller a volante; Trasmettitore a stick; Altro
en: RC motorcycle controller type: App-controlled (phone/tablet); Gamepad; Gesture/motion control; Pistol-grip; Steering wheel controller; Stick transmitter; Other
ru: Тип контроллера радиоуправляемого мотоцикла: Управление через приложение (телефон/планшет); Геймпад; Управление жестами/движением; Пистолетный тип; Контроллер в виде руля; Пульт с джойстиками; Другое
th: ประเภทของชุดควบคุมรถจักรยานยนต์วิทยุบังคับ: ควบคุมผ่านแอป (โทรศัพท์/แท็บเล็ต); เกมแพด; ควบคุมด้วยท่าทาง/การเคลื่อนไหว; ทรงปืน; พวงมาลัยควบคุม; รีโมตแบบคันโยก; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ ovladače RC motocyklu: Řízené aplikací (telefon/tablet); Gamepad; Ovládání gesty/pohybem; Pistolová rukojeť; Volantový ovladač; Páčkový vysílač; Ostatní
hr-HR: Vrsta kontrolera RC motocikla: Upravljano aplikacijom (telefon/tablet); Gamepad; Upravljanje gestama/pokretom; Pištoljski rukohvat; Upravljač (volan); Odašiljač s palicama; Ostalo
zh-TW: 遙控機車控制器類型: 應用程式控制 (手機/平板); 遊戲手把; 手勢/體感控制; 槍控式; 方向盤控制器; 搖桿發射器; 其他
nb: Kontrollertype for radiostyrt motorsykkel: App-styrt (telefon/nettbrett); Spillkontroller; Gest-/bevegelseskontroll; Pistolgrep; Rattkontroller; Stikkesender; Annet
ja: RCバイクコントローラータイプ: アプリ制御 (スマートフォン/タブレット); ゲームパッド; ジェスチャー/モーションコントロール; ピストルグリップ; ステアリングホイールコントローラー; スティック送信機; その他
zh-CN: 遥控摩托车控制器类型: 应用控制（手机/平板电脑）; 游戏手柄; 手势/体感控制; 枪式握把; 方向盘控制器; 操纵杆发射器; 其他
de: Fernsteuerungstyp des RC-Motorrads: App-gesteuert (Smartphone/Tablet); Gamepad; Gesten-/Bewegungssteuerung; Pistolengriff; Lenkrad-Controller; Knüppelsender; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta daljinskega upravljalnika za radijsko vodeni motor: Krmiljeno prek aplikacije (telefon/tablica); Igralni plošček; Krmiljenje s kretnjami/gibanjem; Pistolski ročaj; Krmilnik z volanom; Oddajnik z ročicami; Drugo
pl: Typ kontrolera zdalnie sterowanego motocykla: Sterowanie z aplikacji (telefon/tablet); Kontroler typu gamepad; Sterowanie gestami/ruchem; Kontroler pistoletowy; Kontroler z kierownicą; Aparatura drążkowa; Inne
fi: Radio-ohjattavan moottoripyörän ohjaintyyppi: Sovellusohjattu (puhelin/tabletti); Peliohjain; Ele-/liikeohjaus; Pistoolikahva; Rattiohjain; Sauvaohjain; Muu
fr: Type de contrôleur pour moto RC: Contrôlé par appli (téléphone/tablette); Manette; Contrôle gestuel/par mouvement; Poignée pistolet; Volant de commande; Émetteur à manches; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de comando para motos radiocontroladas: Controlo por app (telemóvel/tablet); Gamepad; Controlo por gestos/movimentos; Punho de pistola; Comando tipo volante; Transmissor com manípulos; Outro
sv: Typ av kontroll för radiostyrd motorcykel: Appstyrd (telefon/surfplatta); Handkontroll; Gest-/rörelsestyrning; Pistolgrepp; Rattkontroll; Spakkontroll; Övrigt
lt-LT: Nuotoliniu būdu valdomo motociklo valdiklio tipas: Valdomas programėle (telefonu / planšetiniu kompiuteriu); Žaidimų pultas; Valdymas gestais / judesiais; Pistoletinė rankena; Vairo formos valdiklis; Svirtinis siųstuvas; Kitas
hu: RC motorkerékpár vezérlő típusa: Alkalmazással vezérelt (telefon/táblagép); Gamepad; Gesztus-/mozgásvezérlés; Pisztoly markolatos; Kormánykerekes vezérlő; Karos távirányító; Egyéb
pt-BR: Motocicleta com controle remoto, tipo de controlador: Controlado por app (celular/tablet); Gamepad; Controle por gestos/movimento; Empunhadura tipo pistola; Controle tipo volante; Transmissor tipo stick; Outros
nl: Type RC-motorfietscontroller: Via app bestuurd (telefoon/tablet); Gamepad; Gebaar-/bewegingsbesturing; Pistoolgreep; Stuurwielcontroller; Stick-zender; Overig
sk-SK: Typ ovládača pretekárskeho motocykla: Ovládanie cez aplikáciu (telefón/tablet); Gamepad; Ovládanie gestami/pohybom; Pištoľový ovládač; Volantový ovládač; Páčkový vysielač; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de radiocomandă pentru motocicletă RC: Control prin app (telefon/tabletă); Gamepad; Control prin gesturi/mișcare; Mâner tip pistol; Controller cu volan; Transmițător cu manete; Altele
da: Controllertype til RC-motorcykel: App-styret (telefon/tablet); Gamepad; Gestus-/bevægelsesstyring; Pistolgreb; Rat-controller; Stick-sender; Andet
es: Tipo de controlador de motocicleta a control remoto: Controlado por app (teléfono/tableta); Mando de juegos; Control por gestos/movimiento; Empuñadura de pistola; Mando de volante; Transmisor de palanca; Otro
bg-BG: Тип контролер за RC мотоциклет: Управление чрез приложение (телефон/таблет); Геймпад; Управление с жестове/движение; Пистолетен тип; Контролер с волан; Лостов предавател; Други
tr: RC motosiklet kumanda tipi: Uygulama kontrollü (telefon/tablet); Oyun kumandası; Hareket/jest kontrolü; Tabanca kabzalı; Direksiyon kumandası; Çubuklu verici; Diğer
el: Τύπος χειρισμού μοτοσικλέτας RC: Ελεγχόμενο μέσω εφαρμογής (τηλέφωνο/tablet); Χειριστήριο (Gamepad); Έλεγχος μέσω χειρονομιών/κίνησης; Λαβή τύπου πιστολιού; Χειριστήριο με τιμόνι; Πομπός με μοχλούς (sticks); Άλλο
ko: RC 오토바이 조종기 유형: 앱 제어형(스마트폰/태블릿); 게임패드; 제스처/모션 제어; 권총형 그립; 스티어링 휠 컨트롤러; 스틱형 송신기; 기타